North Dakota, session 69, HB1566.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATIVE ASSEMBLY OF NORTH DAKOTA:
SECTION 1. LEGISLATIVE MANAGEMENT STUDY - KRATOM USES. During the 2025-26
interim, the legislative management shall consider studying potential uses of kratom and the
implementation of regulations related to uses of kratom in the state, including production,
manufacturing, distribution, and retail sale of kratom products. The legislative management shall report
its findings and recommendations, together with any legislation necessary to implement the
recommendations, to the seventieth legislative assembly.

H. B. NO. 1566 - PAGE 2
____________________________ ____________________________
Speaker of the House President of the Senate
____________________________ ____________________________
Chief Clerk of the House Secretary of the Senate
This certifies that the within bill originated in the House of Representatives of the Sixty-ninth Legislative
Assembly of North Dakota and is known on the records of that body as House Bill No. 1566.
House Vote: Yeas 83 Nays 9 Absent 2
Senate Vote: Yeas 31 Nays 15 Absent 1
____________________________
Chief Clerk of the House
Received by the Governor at ________M. on _____________________________________, 2025.
Approved at ________M. on __________________________________________________, 2025.
____________________________
Governor
Filed in this office this ___________day of _______________________________________, 2025,
at ________ o’clock ________M.
____________________________
Secretary of State